New York, session 2025-2026, S3954.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 6 of section 922 of the labor 2 law, as added by chapter 565 of the laws of 2002, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (b) Worksite employees are [not] automatically deemed pursuant to this 5 section to be employees of the professional employer organization for 6 purposes of general liability, insurance, automobile insurance, fidelity 7 bonds, surety bonds, employer's liability which is not covered by work- 8 ers' compensation, or liquor liability insurance carried by the profes- 9 sional employer organization unless the worksite employees are included 10 by specific reference in the professional employer agreement and appli- 11 cable prearranged employment contract, insurance contract or bond. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08525-01-5